District of Columbia statutes.
26-1111

Surrender of license.

(a)

A licensee may surrender a license by sending to the Superintendent [Commissioner] the license and a written statement that the license is surrendered.

(b)

The surrender of a license does not affect any civil or criminal liability of a licensee for acts committed before the license was surrendered.

History

Sept. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-155, § 12, 43 DCR 4213

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-1011.